es: Nivel de soporte de la mano: Extra fuerte; Fuerte; Ligero; Medio; Otro
nb: Støttenivå for hånd: Ekstra kraftig; Kraftig; Lett; Medium; Annet
fr: Niveau de soutien de la main: Très fort; Fort; Léger; Moyen; Autre
hr-HR: Razina potpore za ruku: Iznimno snažna; Snažna; Blaga; Srednja; Ostalo
da: Håndstøtteniveau: Ekstra kraftig; Kraftig; Let; Medium; Andet
sv: Stödnivå för handled: Extra kraftigt; Kraftigt; Lätt; Medium; Övrigt
ru: Уровень поддержки руки: Экстра-сильная; Сильная; Легкая; Средняя; Другое
pt-BR: Nível de suporte para mãos: Extrapesado; Pesado; Leve; Médio; Outro
zh-CN: 手部支撑等级: 特重; 重度; 轻度; 中度; 其他
tr: El destek seviyesi: Ekstra ağır; Ağır; Hafif; Orta; Diğer
lt-LT: Rankos prilaikymo lygis: Labai stiprus; Stiprus; Lengvas; Vidutinis; Kita
pt-PT: Nível de apoio para as mãos: Extra forte; Forte; Ligeiro; Médio; Outro
hu: Kéztámasz szintje: Extra erős; Erős; Enyhe; Közepes; Egyéb
en: Hand support level: Extra Heavy; Heavy; Light; Medium; Other
bg-BG: Ниво на опора за ръката: Много силна; Силна; Лека; Средна; Друго
ro-RO: Nivel de susținere a mâinii: Foarte ridicat; Ridicat; Scăzut; Mediu; Altele
ja: ハンドサポートレベル: エクストラヘビー; ヘビー; ライト; ミディアム; その他
de: Handstützgrad: Extrastark; Stark; Leicht; Mittel; Sonstige
vi: Mức độ hỗ trợ bàn tay: Siêu cao; Cao; Nhẹ; Trung bình; Khác
ko: 손 보호대 지지 수준: 엑스트라 헤비; 헤비; 라이트; 미디엄; 기타
it: Livello di supporto per la mano: Molto alto; Alto; Leggero; Medio; Altro
pl: Poziom wsparcia dłoni: Bardzo mocne; Mocne; Lekkie; Średnie; Inne
sl-SI: Stopnja podpore za roko: Zelo močno; Močno; Rahlo; Srednje; Drugo
sk-SK: Úroveň opierky na ruku: Extra silná; Silná; Ľahká; Stredná; Iné
el: Επίπεδο υποστήριξης χεριού: Πολύ υψηλό; Υψηλό; Ελαφρύ; Μεσαίο; Άλλο
fi: Käden tuen taso: Erittäin vahva; Vahva; Kevyt; Keskitaso; Muu
nl: Ondersteuningsniveau handschoen: Extra zwaar; Zwaar; Licht; Medium; Overig
cs: Úroveň opory pro ruce: Extra silná; Silná; Lehká; Střední; Jiná
zh-TW: 手部支撐等級: 極重度; 重度; 輕度; 中度; 其他
th: ระดับการรองรับมือ: หนักพิเศษ; หนัก; เบา; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ